Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5694YH (4) 91 je/js H.F. 2380 Section 1. Section 91A.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. âCommunity-based organizationâ means a 3 legal aid or community-based nonprofit organization that has 4 a minimum of five yearsâ experience working with employees 5 or advocating on behalf of employees as well as a successful 6 record of facilitating successful complaints that have been 7 filed by employees with the director under section 91A.10. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 91A.16 Community-based wage 9 enforcement program. 10 1. The director shall establish a community-based wage 11 enforcement program. The director shall enter into contracts 12 with participating community-based organizations to provide 13 funds and other resources to facilitate effective, cooperative 14 community-based enforcement of this chapter and chapter 15 91D. Funds and other resources shall be used to increase 16 the capacity and expertise of community-based organizations 17 in order to improve the education of employees regarding the 18 rights and remedies provided by this chapter and chapter 91D 19 and to secure successful resolution of complaints filed with 20 the director under section 91A.10. All education and services 21 under this section shall be provided at no cost to employees 22 and accessible to any employee in this state. 23 2. The program shall provide for but is not limited to all 24 of the following services by community-based organizations: 25 a. Education for employees regarding the rights provided by 26 this chapter and chapter 91D, which may be conducted jointly 27 with staff of the department of inspections, appeals, and 28 licensing and other relevant agencies and organizations. 29 b. Direct assistance by a worker advocate to assist 30 employees who seek to file a complaint under section 91A.10. 31 c. Legal assistance to employees who seek to file a 32 complaint under section 91A.10. 33 d. Additional assistance for employees who are members 34 of marginalized communities or who are not native English 35 -1- LSB 5694YH (4) 91 je/js 1/ 2 H.F. 2380 speakers. 1 e. Assistance to the director in monitoring for compliance 2 with and conducting investigations under this chapter and 3 chapter 91D. 4